Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.210

Statute tolled—By war as to enemy alien.

When a person shall be an alien subject or a citizen of a country at war with the United States, the time of the continuance of the war shall not be a part of the period limited for the commencement of the action.

[1941 c 174 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 39; 1854 p 365 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 171, part.]